Utah statutes.
17-2-203.   Annexation of portion of county to adjoining county -- Petition
--  Election -- Ballot.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Section 17-2-209, if a majority of the legal
voters of any portion of any county, in number equal to a majority of the
votes cast at the preceding general election within that portion of the
county, desire to have the territory within which they reside included within
the boundaries of an adjoining county, they may petition the county
legislative body of the county in which they reside and the county legislative
body of the adjoining county.
(b)  Each petition under Subsection (1)(a) shall be presented before the first
Monday in June of a year during which a general election is held.
(c)  If a petition is presented under Subsection (1)(a), at the ensuing
regular general election:
(i)  the legislative body of the initiating county shall cause the proposition
to be submitted to the legal voters residing in the initiating county; and
(ii)  the legislative body of the annexing county shall cause the proposition
to be submitted to the legal voters of the annexing county.
(2) (a)  Except as otherwise provided, the election provided in Subsection (1)
shall be held, the results canvassed, and returns made under the provisions of
the general election laws of the state.
(b)  The ballot to be used shall be:
For annexing a portion of ____ county to ____ county.
Against annexing a portion of ____ county to ____ county.
